District of Columbia statutes.
1-622.04

Definitions.

For the purposes of §§ 1-622.05 through 1-622.14, the term:

(1)

“Annuitant” means:

(A)

An employee first employed by the District after September 30, 1987, who has subsequently retired pursuant to any of the following:

(i)

Teachers’ Retirement System (§§ 38-2001.01 to 38-2023.16);

(ii)

Police and Fire Retirement System (§§ 5-707 to 5-730);

(iii)

Judges’ Retirement System (§§ 11-1561 to 11-1571); or

(iv)

Teachers’ Insurance and Annuity Association programs; or

(B)

An employee first employed by the District after September 30, 1987, who has subsequently separated pursuant to the District Retirement Benefit Program (§§ 1-626.03 to 1-626.14) after any of the following:

(i)

Reaching 57 years of age and having completed 25 years of creditable District service in a law enforcement position;

(ii)

Becoming entitled to retirement benefits under the Social Security Act; or

(iii)

Becoming entitled to disability benefits under the Social Security Act.

(2)

“Dependent child” includes:

(A)

An adopted child; and

(B)

A stepchild, foster child, or natural child of an employee or annuitant.

(3)

“Employee” means an individual first employed by the District after September 30, 1987.

(4)

“Member of family” means:

(A)

The spouse of an employee or annuitant;

(B)

An unmarried dependent child under 22 years of age;

(C)

An unmarried dependent child under 25 years of age who is a full-time student; and

(D)

An unmarried child regardless of age who is incapable of self-support because of mental or physical disability that existed before age 22.

(5)

“Viatical settlement” means an irrevocable assignment of all an employee’s or former employee’s incidents of ownership in a life insurance policy.

History

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-139, § 2204
as added Oct. 1, 1987, D.C. Law 7-27, § 2(f), 34 DCR 5079
Mar. 20, 1998, D.C. Law 12-65, § 2(a), 44 DCR 7608
Mar. 20, 1998, D.C. Law 12-66, § 2(b), 45 DCR 343

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 1-623.4.

Temporary Amendment of Section

For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 2(b) of the Comprehensive Merit Personnel Act Health and Life Insurance Clarification Temporary Amendment Act of 1996 (D.C. Law 11-183, April 9, 1997, law notification 44 DCR 2378).
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 2(a) of the District of Columbia Employee Viatical Settlement Temporary Amendment Act of 1996 (D.C. Law 11-188, April 9, 1997, law notification 44 DCR 2383).

Emergency Legislation

For temporary amendment of section, see § 2(b) of the Comprehensive Merit Personnel Act Health Benefits and Life Insurance Clarification Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1997 (D.C. Act 12-27, March 11, 1997, 44 DCR 1892), and § 2(b) of the Comprehensive Merit Personnel Act Health and Life Insurance Clarification Legislative Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1997 (D.C. Act 12-213, December 5, 1997, 44 DCR 7615).
For temporary amendment of section, see § 2(a) of the District of Columbia Employee Viatical Settlement Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1997 (D.C. Act 12-26, March 11, 1997, 44 DCR 1890), and see § 2(a) of the Employee Viatical Settlement Legislative Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1997 (D.C. Act 12-212, December 5, 1997, 44 DCR 7613).